<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88916-0018 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-16-88.f2.A1017</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">50 CFR Part 20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Final Frameworks for Late Season Migratory Bird Hunting Regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Fish and Wildlife Service, Interior.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This rule prescribes final late-season frameworks fromwhich States may select season dates, limits and other options for the1988-89 migratory bird hunting season. The earliest of these seasons generallycommences on or about October 1, 1988, and include most of those for waterfowl.The Service annually prescribes hunting regulations frameworks to the States.The effects of this final rule are to facilitate the selection of huntingseasons by the States and to further the establishment of the late-seasonmigratory bird hunting regulations for 1988-89. State selections will bepublished in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> as amendments to andSection;andSection; 20.104 through20.107 and andSection; 20.109 of Title 50 CFR Part 20.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>This rule takes effect on September 16, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Send State season selections to: Director (FWS/MBMO),U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Department of the Interior, Matomic Building,Room 536, Washington, DC 20240. Comments received on the proposed late-seasonframeworks are available for public inspection during normal business hoursin Room 536, Matomic Building, 1717 H Street, NW., Washington, DC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Rollin D. Sparrowe, Chief, Officeof Migratory Bird Management, U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Departmentof the Interior, Matomic Building, Room 536, Washington, DC 20240. Telephone(202) 254-3207.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The Migratory Bird Treaty Act of July3, 1918 (40 Stat. 755; 16 U.S.C. 703 <T3>et seq.</T3>), as amended, authorizes and directs the Secretary ofthe Interior, having due regard for the zones of temperature and for thedistribution, abundance, economic value, breeding habits, and times andlines of flight of migratory game birds, to determine when, to what extent,and by what means such birds or any part, nest or egg thereof may be taken,hunted, captured, killed, possessed, sold, purchased, shipped, carried,exported or transported.On March 9, 1988, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (hereinafter the Service)published for public comment in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 7702) a proposal to amend 50 CFR Part20, with comment periods ending June 22, 1988, for Alaska, Hawaii, PuertoRico, and the Virgin Islands; July 18, 1988, for other early-season proposals;and August 25, 1988, for the late-season proposals. The March 9 documentdealt with the establishment of hunting seasons, hours, areas and limitsfor migratory game birds under andSection; 20.101 through 20.107, 20.109and 20.110 of Subpart K. On June 7, 1988, the Service published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 20874) a second document consisting ofa supplemental proposed rulemaking dealing with both the early- and late-seasonframeworks. On July 11, 1988, the Service published for public commentin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 26198) a third document consisting ofa proposed rulemaking dealing specifically with frameworks for early-seasonmigratory bird hunting regulations. That document also reopened and extendedthe comment period for the proposed frameworks for Alaska, Puerto Ricoand Virgin Islands from June 22, 1988, to July 20, 1988. All three documents,March 9, June 7, and July 11, indicated that special consideration wasbeing given to possible restrictive regulations for all aspects of the1988-89hunting season dependent upon the continuing poor status of ducks. On August9, 1988, the Service published a fourth document (53 FR 29897) containingfinal frameworks for early migratory bird hunting seasons from which wildlifeconservation agency officials from the States, Puerto Rico and the VirginIslands selected early-season hunting dates, hours, areas and limits for1988-89. The fifth document in the series, published August 12, 1988, inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 30622), deals specifically with proposedframeworks for the 1988-89 late-season migratory bird hunting regulations.On August 31, 1988, the Service published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 33792) a sixth document consisting ofa final rule amending Subpart K of Title 50 CFR Part 20 to set huntingseasons, hours, areas and limits for mourning doves, white-winged and white-tippeddoves, band-tailed pigeons, rails, woodcock, common snipe, and common moorhenand purple gallinules; sea ducks in certain defined areas of the AtlanticFlyway; wood ducks in September in Florida, Kentucky and Tennessee; Canadageese in September in portions of Illinois, Michigan and Minnesota; sandhillcranes in the Central and Pacific Flyways; a special Canada goose seasonin southwestern Wyoming; migratory game birds in Alaska, Hawaii, PuertoRico and the Virgin Islands; and extended falconry seasons. The seventhin the series is this document which establishes final frameworks for late-seasonmigratory bird hunting regulations for the 1988-89 season.<ITAG tagnum="84">Review of Comments and the Service's Response</ITAG>Twenty-four verbal comments on the late-season migratory bird hunting regulationswere received at the public hearing in Washington, DC, August 3, 1988.A total of 1,971 written comments, including a petition containing 1,100signatures and 110 signed form letters (hereafter called petitioners),were received through August 29, 1988. Summaries of these comments andthe Service's responses are listed below by categories identified in theMarch 9, 1988, <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 7702). The proposed frameworks publishedin the August 12, 1988, <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 30622) contained several regulatory changesnot reviewed at the public hearing, namely daily shooting hours, suspensionof the point system, modification of mallard bag limits in the PacificFlyway, and a limited season on pintails, therefore, the public hearingcomments do not address these issues.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulations Process</ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments</T3>_Mr. Brian O'Neil, a trial lawyer retainedby the Humane Society of the United States, announced that he intends toexplore the Service's process for establishing hunting regulations to insurecompliance with the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA), the MigratoryBird Treaty Act, and other applicable laws and regulations. Questions willbe posed such as: does the hunting season structure provide adequate protectionto species such as black ducks, pintails, canvasbacks, and others, anddoes the decision process take a hard look at a ``no season'' alternativeto protect ducks? He stated that the Supplemental Environmental ImpactStatement (SEIS-88) on migratory bird hunting, completed in 1988, doesnot do this, and this alternative must be considered. He further statedthat annual consideration of a ``no season'' alternative may relieve somehunting pressure and tells the hunting public that business is not ``asusual.''<T3>Written Comments</T3>_The Central Flyway Council, the States of Missouri,Colorado, Michigan, Mississippi, Rhode Island, Nebraska and Texas, 1,100petitioners, and 88 individuals were critical of the process by which thelate-season frameworks were developed this year. They collectively faultedthe process because: (1) They allegedly had not received prior notificationthat certain changes in frameworks were in the offing, (2) the ServiceRegulations Committee's recommendations were more restrictive than thosesuggested as being necessary by the Office of Migratory Bird Management,and (3) the Director proposed regulations more restrictive than these recommendedto him by the Service Regulations Committee. Of particular concern wereproposed changes in frameworks pertaining to shooting hours, suspensionof the point system, reduced bag limits on mallards, and a complicatedsplit season for pintails.One individual requested that the Service reevaluate the process for receivingpublic comments because some Mississippi waterfowl hunters reported theywere denied the opportunity to comment via telephone.<T3>Response.</T3> A ``no season'' alternative for migratory bird huntingis always a consideration; this alternative has been employed when thestatus of a species or population warrants such action. For example, aseason on canvasbacks has not been permitted since 1985 in the Atlantic,Mississippi and Central Flyways, and this year the closure is expandedto include the Pacific Flyway. The requirements of NEPA, the EndangeredSpecies Act, and other laws and regulations are annually considered andreviewed in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 30627). The 1975 Environmental ImpactStatement (EIS) on the Issuance of Annual Regulations Permitting the SportHunting of Migratory Birds (FES-75) addressed a no season alternative.The Supplemental Environmental Impact Statement (SEIS-88) on MigratoryBird Hunting completed earlier this year was developed to supplement, notreplace, the original EIS. Since the no season alternative was not includedin the SEIS-88, the discussion of this option in the orginal EIS is stillapplicable. In addition, an environmental assessment entitled <T3>EA_Waterfowl Hunting Regulations for 1988</T3> addresses this rulemakingand a Finding of No Significant Impact was signed on September 1, 1988.This EA includes complete season closure as one alternative for this year.The Service continues to support the annual process whereby Flyway Councils,through consultants to the Service, provide input to the development ofregulations frameworks. The Councils, States, the general public, organizations,and agencies, are provided opportunity to offer comments and recommendationsduring public hearings and open comment periods. The Director must considerthese often diverse recommendations as well as recommendations from hisown staff before establishing the frameworks. The Director has the legaland ultimate responsibility for safeguarding the migratory bird resource.Overall, the process calls for the Director to receive information throughthe established process and assess the long-term welfare of the resource.Such a role frequently leads to decisions which cannot please all partiesequally. In this case the emphasis is to err on the side of the duck resource.The Service accepts and considers all written comments received duringthe open comment period, as well as oral comments given at the public hearing,which are transcribed by a court stenographer. It would be an undue burdenupon the Service to accurately transcribe oral comments received by telephoneor to accept such comments without the possibility of verifying the identityof the commenter, which otherwise is possible by signature on a writtendocument. Further, such summaries of oral comments may or may not accuratelyreflect the views and emphasis of commentors. For these reasons, commentsother than those at public hearings can be accepted in writing only.1. Shooting hours<T3>Public Hearing Comments_</T3>Mr. John Anderson, representing the NationalAudubon Society, suggested that starting the duck season at noon on openingday and thereafter begin shooting at sunrise, rather than one-half hourbefore sunrise, would reduce the harvest of ducks.<T3>Written Comments_</T3>The Atlantic and Central Flyway Councils, theStates of Missouri, Oklahoma, New York, Maryland, Utah, Nebraska, Colorado,New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Rhode Island, and Maine, two regional waterfowlorganizations, 126 individuals, and 1,100 petitioners opposed changingshooting hours to start at sunrise instead of one-half hour before sunrise.Reasons cited include enforcement problems, hunter dissatisfaction, a shiftto evening hunting would place more harvest pressure on wood ducks, anddoubt that the change would significantly reduce harvest. The State ofIllinois, The Wildlife Society, the Humane Society of the United States,and 10 individuals supported the change to a sunrise beginning. The NationalWildlife Federation endorsed a review of the effect of allowing shootingto begin one-half hour before sunrise, with emphasis on identificationof waterfowl by hunters and impact on total duck harvest. The State ofMassachusetts recommended that a one-half hour before sunrise beginningbe allowed during seasons outside the regular duck season, and 130 individualssuggested that shooting hours open at sunrise for ducks and one-half hourbefore sunrise for geese. Seven individuals and 110 petitioners suggestedshooting hours of one-half hour before sunrise to noon.<T3>Response. </T3>Although the Service announced in the June 7, 1988,<T4>Federal Register </T4>that no change in shooting hours was planned,field studies by the Service suggest that about 15 percent of the duckharvest may occur during the period from 30 minutes before sunrise to sunrise.The change to sunrise-sunset shooting hours is in addition to other changesto help assure a significant reduction in duck harvest. Heretofore shootinghours under Federal regulations have been one-half hour before sunriseto sunset. The Service intends to review this issue further with the Statesand Councils prior to setting the 1989-90 hunting regulations.The Service believes that different shooting hours for ducks and geesewould unnecessarily complicate the regulations since ducks and geese arehunted in the same locations in many areas of the country. Further, a changein shooting hours for geese outside the duck season would give disparateadvantage to States where geese winter and are hunted later and for longerperiods. Consistency in shooting hours will aid hunters in complying withregulations and will clarify enforcement by State and Federal officers.2. Frameworks for Ducks in the Conterminous United States_Outside Dates,Season Length and Bag Limits<ITAG tagnum="81">a. General Harvest Strategy</ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments_</T3>Of the 22 persons addressing the recommendedstrategy for reducing duck harvest, 11 offered qualified support, 8 believedthat the recommended frameworks should be more restrictive, and 3 believedframeworks proposed for the Atlantic Flyway were inappropriate and toorestrictive.Mr. Eldridge Hunt, representing the Pacific Flyway Council, believed therecommended frameworks for ducks were reasonable for protecting waterfowlwintering in the Pacific Flyway. Mr. Dale Strickland, representing theCentral Flyway Council, Mr. Hugh Bateman, representing the MississippiFlyway Council's Southern Region, and Mr. Ken Babcock, representing theMississippi Flyway Council's Northern Region, supported restrictive regulationsbut were dissatisfied that the Service had not indicated earlier that specialstrategies should be developed to further reduce harvest of midcontinentmallards. They indicated that if the Service had provided such directionthe Councils could have addressed this need during their deliberations.Modifications of Council recommendations by the Service Regulations Committeewould result in inequities in harvest opportunities, an erosion of thepoint system, and potential for increased harvests of several species.Mr. Leon Kirkland, representing the Atlantic Flyway Council, generallysupported a strategy of reducing harvests on most duck species, but didnot believe that the degree of reduction should be as great for the AtlanticFlyway as for other Flyways since a smaller proportion of Atlantic Flywayducks are derived form the areas most stressed by drought and poor nestingconditions. Mr. Charles Potter, representing the North American WildlifeFoundation, stated that ducks need protection now more than ever and ifmajor restrictions are not implemented, credibility with hunters will belost. He suggested that a level of protection at least equal to that givenduring the drought years of 1961 and 1964 would be appropriate this year.Mr. Jack Lorenz, representing the Izaak Walton League, supported the recommendationsof the North American Wildlife Foundation. Mr. Jim Phillips, writer andduck hunter, believed that the proposed harvest strategy is not restrictiveenough and recommended a general harvest reduction of about 50 percent.Mr. George Reiger, outdoor editor for <T3>Field andamp; Stream </T3>magazine, voiced concern by his readershipover the status of ducks and need for restrictive measures, perhaps evenseason closures. Mr. Doug Inkley, National Wildlife Federation, generallysupported the season reductions proposed by the Service. Mr. Mike Berger,representing Ducks Unlimited, Inc., Mr. Steve Miller, representing theWisconsin Department of Natural Resources, and Mr. Roger Holmes, representingthe Minnesota Department of Natural Resources, all expressed general supportfor the proposed strategy to reduce duck harvests. On behalf of the NationalAudubon Society, Mr. John Anderson supported the strategy to reduce huntingopportunity by at least 25 percent, but suggested the some alternativemeasures to accomplish this reduction. Mr. James Yoos and Mr. Stanley Nadler,representing the New Jersey Waterfowler's Association, expressed concernthat the proposed strategy unfairly restricted the Atlantic Flyway andsuggested that harvest reductions should be focused on areas where specificproblems are occurring. Mr. John Viser, representing the Berry Brooks Foundation,and citizen Grayson Chesser both suggested that the strategy of reducingduck harvest by 25 percent, while commendable, is not adequate and bothsuggested a reduction of 50 percent would be more appropriate.<T3>Written Comments_</T3>The Atlantic and Central Flyway Councils, theStates of New York, Florida, Massachusetts, Maryland, Delaware, Vermont,Minnesota, Wisconsin, Michigan, Illinois, Kentucky and Mississippi, theWildlife Management Institute, The Wildlife Society, the National WildlifeFederation, 63 individuals, and 110 petitioners expressed general supportfor the objective of reducing duck harvests during the 1988-89 huntingseason. Fifty-six individuals and 1,100 petitioners commented in oppositionto this harvest strategy. The Atlantic Flyway Council, the States of NewYork, Vermont, Rhode Island, Florida and Massachusetts, and one regionalwaterfowl organization commented that restrictions on harvest are moresevere than the situation warrants in the Atlantic Flyway and that a broad-brushapproach to regulations is a movement away from flyway and species management.Missouri questioned whether regulations changes that suspend the pointsystem, restrict shooting hours, establish partial season closures on pintails,and propose possible duck season closures in local areas are necessaryin order to achieve the desired harvest reduction.One hundred individuals and 1,100 petitioners expressed concern that severlyrestrictive regulations would contribute to a general decline in duck hunters,reduce revenues for State and Federal habitat programs, and reduce theincentive for maintenance of private waterfowl habitats.<T3>Response. </T3>The Service is encouraged by the widespread supportfor restrictive harvest strategies for the 1988-89 season. The Servicerecognizes that hunting is not the principal cause of the current declinein duck numbers, but faced with the continuing drought, poor productionthis year, and an expected small fall flight, further harvest reductionsare necessary. The Service believes that the inclusion of the AtlanticFlyway in this conservative harvest strategy is warranted. Some stocksof ducks that winter in the Atlantic Flyway are less affected by droughton the prairie breeding grounds, but many ducks important to the Flywayharvest are derived from areas showing declining populations.The Service earlier explained publicly in press releases and a widely distributedvideo that the poor outlook for ducks was based on widespread and persistentdeclining habitats and populations. The likelihood of a rapid populationrebound is poor because of depleted soil moisture, lack of water in marshes,habitat clearance since 1980, and reduced populations. Further, informationfrom August duck banding in the United States and Canada has documentedcontinuing dry conditions and very low production by primary duck species.The situation may well deteriorate further before it improves, and strongaction is required to try to avoid even more drastic measures in the nearfuture.The Service recognizes the concern for maintaining hunter interest andprivate habitat management programs during times of restrictive regulations.However, the Service believes that both hunters and private habitat managersunderstand the need to reduce harvest during years of low duck populations,especially when production is poor. All State and Federal organizationsare urged to work with hunters and landowners to increase their appreciationof the need for these restrictive measures to benefit the duck resourceon a long-term basis.<ITAG tagnum="81">b. Framework Dates</ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments_</T3>Mr. Steve Miller, representing the WisconsinDepartment of Natural Resources, endorsed the proposed October 8-January8 framework opening and closing dates for duck hunting. Mr. Doug Inkley,representing the National Wildlife Federation, endorsed the January 8 closingdate. Mr. Leon Kirkland, representing the Atlantic Flyway Council, recommendedthat the framework closing date be January 15 instead of January 8, statingthat the best hunting opportunity in the southern part of the flyway occursafter January 1, and citing previous experience with a January 13 closingdate which resulted in reduced harvests.<T3>Written Comments</T3>_The States of Wisconsin, Illinois, Kentucky andOklahoma, the National Wildlife Federation, and the Wildlife Society endorsedthe proposed framework opening and closing dates. The Atlantic Flyway Council,the States of New York, Florida, Maine, Mississippi, Rhode Island, Vermontand Maryland, and 34 individuals recommended framework dates differentfrom those proposed, either an earlier opening date, a later closing date,or both. <T3>Response</T3>. The Service notes the comments supporting the proposedframework dates. In view of the poor production experienced by duck populationsthis year, the Service's primary objective for the 1988-89 hunting seasonis to reduce duck harvests in order to help maintain basic breeding populations.To accomplish this objective, hunting opportunity must be reduced. Theperiod of time during which hunting seasons can be held is an importantcomponent of hunting-season regulations and acts in concert with otherregulations to influence harvest levels. If changes in the opening andclosing framework dates are not considered, even greater restrictions inother regulations such as season length, bag limits, etc., would be necessaryto accomplish the desired harvest reduction. A minor change in the AtlanticFlyway adopts October 7 as the opening framework date. The Service believesthe combination of regulations proposed this year is appropriate to achievethe harvest-reduction objective while still providing an adequate amountof hunting opportunity. <ITAG tagnum="81">c. Season Length </ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments</T3>_Representatives of eight organizationscommented on the season lengths proposed by the Service. Mr. Doug Inkley,representing the National Wildlife Federation, Mr. Charles Potter, representingthe North American Wildlife Foundation, and Mr. Jack Lorenz, representingthe Izaak Walton League, generally supported the Service recommendationsfor shorter seasons. Mr. Leon Kirkland, representing the Atlantic FlywayCouncil, while supporting some reduction in season length, disagreed witha 25 percent reduction for the Atlantic Flyway, citing the comparativelysmall proportion of prairie-nesting mallards, blue-winged teal and pintails(species most are affected by the drought), that are harvested in the AtlanticFlyway. Mr. Kirkland stated that only 2.8 percent of the harvest of prairie-nestingmallards occurs in the Atlantic Flyway, and percentages are similar tothis for blue-winged teal and pintails. He noted that the predicted fallflight into the Atlantic Flyway is not forecast to be significantly changedfrom that in 1987. He recommended that the season length in the AtlanticFlyway be 35 days, which would be a 12.5 percent reduction from 1987. JimPhillips, writer and duck hunter, recommended a 30-day season nationwide,while Mr. John Anderson of the National Audubon Society recommended a 25-dayseason nationwide. Mr. Roger Holmes, representing the Minnesota Departmentof Natural Resources, asked that an additional 5-day reduction in seasonlength in the Mississippi and Central Flyways, over and above the 25 percentreduction proposed by the Service, be considered if mallard point valueswere returned to 35. Mr. Richard Bishop, representing the Iowa Departmentof Natural Resources, suggested that further reductions in season lengthwould be preferable to further reductions in the mallard bag limit. <T3>Written Comments</T3>_The State of Illinois, one regional waterfowlorganization, and four individuals recommended reducing the length of thehunting season to help reduce the harvest of ducks. One individual andone regional waterfowl organization recommended longer seasons in the AtlanticFlyway to compensate for hunting days lost because Sunday hunting is prohibitedin many States. One individual and one regional waterfowl organizationrecommended longer seasons in 1988-89. The States of New York, Rhode Island,Florida, and Massachusetts, two regional waterfowl organizations, and severalindividuals recommended a 35-day season in the Atlantic Flyway to (1) compensatefor days lost to prohibition by many States of Sunday hunting and (2) becauseduck populations in the flyway have been less affected by this year's drought.Also, they maintained that a 25-percent reduction in season length is notwarranted since the fall flight of ducks into the Atlantic Flyway is expectedto be similar to that of 1987. One regional waterfowl organization commentedthat since 1983 the duck season in California has been reduced from 93to 59 days. One regional waterfowl organization, 41 individuals and 1,100petitioners recommended longer seasons in 1988-89. Most recommended a 50-or 51-day season in Texas. <T3>Response.</T3> The Service believes that reductions in season lengthare of primary importance in reducing the harvest by limiting hunting opportunity.Consequently, season lengths have been reduced proportionally in all flyways.The Service acknowledges that the harvest of ducks in the Atlantic Flywaythat originate from the surveyed areas is small when compared with otherflyways, but these birds represent a significant proportion of the harvestin the Atlantic Flyway and the Service believes it is important to protectthese stocks of birds. Due to the overflight of ducks to more northernareas in response to the drought, the Service's fall flight estimate tothe Atlantic Flyway is less precise this year than in years with betterhabitat conditions. Also, this year's production from northern areas isestimated to have been poor. Hunting days in California have been reducedproportionally as in other flyways. Many ducks important in the PacificFlyway harvest are derived from mid-continent breeding areas. The Servicebelieves the season reductions in all flyways are warranted in view ofthe overall poor status of many duck species. <ITAG tagnum="81">d. Closed Season </ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments</T3>_Mr. Charles Potter, representing the NorthAmerican Wildlife Foundation, Mr. Jack Lorenz, representing the Izaak WaltonLeague, and Mr. Doug Inkley, representing the National Wildlife Federation,endorsed a season closure on canvasbacks and pintails. Mr. Bill Nickel,representing the Eastern Shore Waterfowl Trust, called for planned closuresin future years to stockpile breeding ducks. <T3>Written Comments</T3>_The State of Florida, the Wildlife ManagementInstitute, 21 individuals and 110 petitioners suggested that a closed seasonon pintails should at least be considered. The Humane Society of the UnitedStates called for closed seasons on seven species of ducks, including pintails,most of which have populations substantially below long-term averages.A regional waterfowl organization and 18 individuals called for a closedseason on all ducks, while five others suggested either a total closureor a very restricted season. One individual opposed closing the seasonuntil harvest plans have been developed with Canada and Mexico. Missouri commented on the statement by the Director in the proposed rule(53 FR 30621) that additional closures would be considered if unusallylarge concentrations of waterfowl occur during migration and winteringperiods, suggesting such closures would be difficult to justify and perceivedas arbitrary unless specific criteria are developed before closures wouldbe proposed. <T3>Response.</T3> The restrictive regulations established for the 1988-89hunting season are expected to reduce overall duck harvests by at least25 percent. For pintails, this percentage may be considerably larger. Whilepopulations are seriously depressed and a reduced fall flight is expected,the data available do not suggest the need for a closed season for allducks. See also responses to earlier comments on the Regulations Process.The Service actively considered closure for black ducks (March 9, 1988,<T4>Federal Register</T4>, 53 FR 7702), and took that action for canvasbacks.The evidence available for mallard and pintail populations suggests lackof recruitment due to continuing habitat depletion as a more major problem.While the closure of seasons on those species was not decided upon, strongadditional restrictions were placed on harvest in all flyways and closureis acknowledged as a possible future action depending upon habitat andpopulations. Many correspondents noted that a closed season would eliminatemost of the revenue that is currently received from license and stamp sales,as well as eliminate private-landowner incentives to maintain habitat.The Service has attempted to balance all the arguments in its proposedaction. With regard to possible area closures during the migration andwintering periods, the Service will work with the States to monitor majorconcentration areas and will consult with the States if closures appearto be needed. <ITAG tagnum="81">e. Bag Limits </ITAG><T3>Public Hearing Comments</T3>_Messrs. Kenneth Babcock and Hugh Bateman,representing the Mississippi Flyway Council, Mr. Dale Strickland, representingthe Central Flyway Council, and Mr. Richard Bishop, representing the IowaDepartment of Natural Resources, while recognizing the need for harvestreductions in mallards and other species, opposed a reduced bag limit formallard drakes. They generally believe that such a change in not warrantedbecause other restrictions being proposed, such as reduced season lengthsand constricted framework dates, would accomplish the desired reductionin mallard harvest. They further believe that an increase in point valuesof drakes would actually redirect hunting pressure toward female mallardsand other species of concern, and may force States to shift from the pointsystem of bag limits which, they believe, would result in a higher killof mallard hens than under the point system. Mr. John Anderson, representingthe National Audubon Society, recommended a simplified 2-duck daily baglimit with no species or sex restrictions. Mr. Anderson noted that, whilesuch a bag limit would seem to be a liberalization on species and sexesfor which only one is allowed at present, this would be preferable to acomplicated point system and would eliminate identification problems. Mr.Anderson cited studies that suggested high-point birds were discarded byhunters at a greater rate than low-point birds and indicated that Federallaw-enforcement agents generally believe that the point system is unenforceable.He further cited a recent analysis which concluded that the point systemregulations have not successfully directed harvest away from mallard femalesand toward males. <T3>Field andamp; Stream</T3> Conservation Editor George Reiger identifieda number of problems with enforcement of and compliance with the pointsystem and suggested that the system is not working as intended. <T3>Written Comments</T3>_The Central Flyway Council, the States of Colorado,Oklahoma and Rhode Island, 110 individuals, and 1,210 petitioners recommendedhigher bag limits, particularly for species whose status is relativelygood. The most common recommendation was for a daily bag limit of 4 speciesat or above long-term average population levels. The State of Texas requestedthat the recommendations of the Central Flyway Council be adopted. TheStates of New York, Maryland, Florida, Maine, Illinois and Kentucky, theNational Wildlife Federation and the Wildlife Management Institute supportedthe bag-limit reduction proposed by the Service. The Central Flyway Council and the States of Missouri, Nebraska, Colorado,Oklahoma, and Florida opposed the suspension of the point system, suggestingthat elimination of the point system will direct greater harvest pressuretoward species and sexes requiring greater protection. The State of Illinoisand the Humane Society of the United States supported suspension of thepoint system. Forty-eight individuals called for elimination of the pointsystem, while 187 individuals (including 110 petitioners) requested thatit continue to be offered. The Central Flyway Council and the State of Oklahoma recommended that thedrake mallard bag limit be retained at 3 and that the hen mallard possessionlimit for the Central Flyway be 2, as it is with the other flyways. TheState of Alabama recommended retention of a 3-drake mallard bag limit forthe Mississippi Flyway. The States of California, Arizona, Idaho and Utahrequested that a 4-drake mallard limit be retained in the Pacific Flywayrather than the proposed reduction to 3. The Wildlife Management Institutesupported a continued daily bag limit of one mallard hen, as did essentiallyall others who commented on mallard bag limits. Two regional waterfowlorganizations requested a 4-drake mallard bag limit in the Pacific Flyway.Numerous comments were received on the proposal to split and severely restrictthe season on pintails. The Atlantic and Central Flyway Councils, the Statesof Michigan, Missouri, Colorado, Illinois, New York, Florida, Massachusetts,Maryland, Vermont, Arizona, Idaho, Utah, Oklahoma, Delaware and California,the National Wildlife Federation, 2 waterfowl organizations, 63 individualsand 1,100 petitioners indicated that, while restrictions on pintail harvestare needed, such a regulation would be confusing, difficult to enforce,unnecessarily complicate regulations, and result in a substantial numberof wasted ducks. Most of these recommended a simplified regulation of 1pintail of either sex daily throughout the season or, alternatively, 1pintail of either sex during part of the season and 1 drake pintail duringthe rest of the season. The Humane Society of the United States specifically recommended that mergansersbe included in the duck bag limit due to lack of information on statusof mergansers. <T3>Response.</T3> The Service agrees that populations of some speciessuch as gadwall, wigeon, shovelers and green-winged teal are above long-termaverages, although all have been adversely affected by the severe droughtand reduced habitat quality this year. However, due to the drought andpoor production from most prairie and parkland-nesting species and thedepressed status of some important species, the Service desires to reducehunting opportunity in general to effect an additional reduction in harvestof ducks comparable to that which occurred upon implementation of restrictiveregulations in 1985 and continued through 1987. In the Service's view,a 4-bird versus a 3-bird bag limit likely would lessen the effectivenessof additional restrictions on certain species and sexes, resulting in largerharvests of all species. The Service is suspending the point system this year and will conduct afull review of the system as a bag limit option. Law-enforcement agentsand hunter-observation studies in the past suggested that wanton wasteof high-point birds and reordering of bags may be serious problems in somesituations. Reordering is unique to the point system and is a violationthat is, in many cases, unenforceable. With regard to requests that a 4-drake mallard bag limit be allowed inthe Pacific Flyway, the harvest of mallards in that flyway is derived frommany areas, some more influenced by the recent and persistent drought thanothers. Mallards from the various breeding areas mix to varying degreesin migration and wintering areas and cannot be differentiated; therefore,differential harvests are neither practical nor, in most cases, possible.The current strategy of providing added protection to mallards, pintails,and ducks in general is prudent until the status of duck populations improves.Thus, the Service believes a reduction of one drake in the mallard bagfor the Pacific Flyway is warranted. The Service concurs with the comments regarding the possession limit ofmallard hens in the Central Flyway, and a 2-bird possession limit is providedin these final frameworks. However, the Service does not concur with retaininglast year's 3-drake mallard bag limit in the Central Flyway. The mallardfall flight index this year is the second lowest on record. This criticalstatus warrants significant additional harvest reductions which will requirelower bag limits for all ducks. Regarding the numerous comments about the proposed split and restrictedpintail season, the Service acknowledges the enforcement problems as wellas hunter confusion and wanton waste it may create. The proposal was anattempt to drastically curtail harvest of this species while still providingsome opportunity for harvest and incentive for private landowners to maintainhabitat late in the season for this and other waterfowl species. Afterconsidering the comments, the Service concurs that the proposal shouldbe modified, thus, this final rule permits a 1 pintail daily bag limitof either sex, with 2 in possession, throughout the season in all flyways.The Service believes this action will still achieve a significant reductionin harvest while reducing the enforcement and wanton-waste problems associatedwith the original proposal. Concerning comments that mergansers should be included in the regular duckbag limit, the Service has no information to suggest that the populationstatus or harvest of any merganser species warrants additional restrictionsat this time. While the utility of annual surveys in assessing the statusof mergansers is limited, data from various surveys and studies being conductedin the United States and Canada suggest that the combined breeding populationsof the three merganser species exceeds 1 million, while recent harvestsin the United States have averaged less than 100,000 (SEIS-88). Such datado not suggest that hunting under the current regulations is likely toadversely affect any species of mergansers. A 1-bird bag limit restrictionon hooded mergansers is already in place in the three eastern flyways.3. Black Ducks <T3>Written Comments</T3>_Two regional waterfowl organizations and oneindividual commented that regulations on black ducks for the 1988-89 seasonshould remain similar to last year or should be liberalized to 2 birdsdaily with a shortened season. The Wildlife Management Institute recommendedthe Service continue to control the black duck harvest in the United Statesto accelerate a rebuilding of the population. They urged Canada to takefurther harvest restrictions on black ducks. The Humane Society calledfor a closed season on black ducks and one individual called for a closedseason on hen black ducks. <T3>Response</T3>. The Service believes that black duck populations cansupport the level of harvest obtained during the 1988-89 season. Thereare plans to coordinate future black duck harvest strategies with Canada.Regulation frameworks for all ducks during the 1988-89 hunting season willbe more restrictive which will likely further reduce harvest of black ducks.Therefore, these frameworks provide for a continuation of the restrictiveblack duck regulations established in recent years.7. Extra Teal Option<T3>Public Hearing Comments</T3>_Mr. Leon Kirkland, representing the AtlanticFlyway Council, recommended that blue-winged teal be suspended as partof the teal bonus but requested that green-winged teal continue to be offeredwith 2 birds daily for the first 9 consecutive hunting days. He statedthat greenwings have been part of the extra teal bag in the flyway since1979 without adverse effects and breeding populations are 46 percent aboveobjective levels.<T3>Written Comments</T3>_The States of New York, Rhode Island, and Florida,and one regional waterfowl organization expressed their support for continuingthe bonus on green-winged teal during the first 9 days of the regular season.They argue that greenwings have been a bonus species in the Atlantic Flywaysince 1979 without adverse effects and breeding populations are above objectivelevels.<T3>Response</T3>. The extra teal option was originally established toincrease harvest opportunity on blue-winged teal which were abundant andlightly harvested. However, bluewing populations have declined in recentyears. The Service has moved to reduce hunting opportunity in all flywaysthrough restrictive regulations. The greenwing bonus, unique to the AtlanticFlyway, is also being suspended to give added protection to bluewings andall ducks because the Service is concerned whether greenwings can be selectivelyharvested. The Service believes that virtually no special harvest opportunitiesfor ducks are warranted in the 1988-89 season. 9. Special Scaup Season<T3>Written Comments</T3>_The States of New York and Rhode Island, oneregional waterfowl organization, and one individual requested a continuationof the 16-day special scaup season outside the regular duck season. TheState of Vermont urged the Service to consider continuance of the 16-dayspecial scaup-goldeneye season for Lake Champlain with a bag limit of 3goldeneyes only to protect scaup. They maintain that goldeneyes are a lightly-harvestedresources and would provide late-season hunters more opportunity to enjoytheir sport.<T3>Response</T3>. Special scaup seasons were suspended this year becausepopulation estimates have remained below objective levels in recent years.The Service believes it is inconsistent to continue special harvest opportunitiesuntil scaup populations recover. With reference to the special scaup-goldeneyeseason on Lake Champlain, the season was established primarily to harvestscaup. Little information is available about the status of goldeneyes.However, mid-winter survey indices for goldeneyes in the Atlantic Flywaysuggest a decline similar to that exhibited by scaup.10. Extra Scaup Option<T3>Written Comments</T3>_The States of Florida and Rhode Island recommendedno change in the bonus-scaup option. The State of New York recommendedthat alternatives to a complete suspension be considered. Both States suggestreducing the bonus to 1 bird, reducing the season length, and restrictingthe harvest to areas containing only greater scaup.<T3>Response</T3>. The extra scaup option has been suspended for reasonssimilar to those for suspension of special scaup seasons. The Service believesthat harvest opportunity during the regular season is warranted; however,in view of the beginning status of the species, special harvest opportunitiesare not appropriate at this time. 12. Canvasback and Redhead Ducks<T3>Written Comments</T3>_Numerous States, the Wildlife Management Institute,the Wildlife Society, the National Wildlife Federation, and numerous individualsendorsed the closure of the canvasback season nationwide. No comments werereceived opposing the closure.<T3>Response</T3>. The Service notes the support of the actions taken toclose the season in all flyways.13. Duck Zones<T3>Written Comments</T3>_Wyoming asked that zones be dropped in theirState to simplify regulations and that they be allowed to split their season3 ways. Kansas expressed their opposition to the Service's position onzoning. They believe that if zoning has been allowed in some States, itshould then be available to other States pending an evaluation based onthe established criteria. The State of Louisiana and one individual expressedopposition to the Service's action to keep the western zone of Louisianain the Mississippi Flyway. They stated that this position is not justifiedbased on results of an extensive research study and that the final decisionwas based arbitrarily on political motives. New York supported continuationof zoning in the Atlantic Flyway, with zoning in Vermont considered operational.One regional waterfowl organization requested the continued use of zonesin Massachusetts. <T3>Response</T3>. The final frameworks herein include the option for Wyomingto split their hunting season 3 ways in lieu of zoning. The Service stillbelieves that no new zones for duck hunting should be permitted and presentzones should not become operational prior to the consideration of zoningin the reevaluation of harvest systems mentioned in the August 12, 1988,<T4>Federal Register </T4>(53 FR 30623). The final frameworks herein includeprovision for continuation of present zones. The Service has consideredcomments about Louisiana zones and reiterates its position stated in theJune 7, 1988, <T4>Federal Register </T4>(53 FR 20876). The use of zones in Louisianaunder Mississippi Flyway regulations is continued pending the reevaluationof harvest systems mentioned above.14. Frameworks for Geese in the Conterminous United States_Outside Dates,Season Length and Bag LimitsAtlantic Flyway<T3>Written Comments</T3>_The State of New York, one regional waterfowlorganization and one individual recommended that the brant season be increasedto 50 days. One regional waterfowl organization recommended a longer Canadagoose season. One individual recommended that goose hunting be permittedonly during the latter part of each week. One individual recommended thatthe goose bag limit be increased to 3 in 1989-90. The State of Pennsylvaniarecommended that the Canada goose bag limit be increased to 3 in the northwesternpart of the State around Pymatuning Reservoir. The State of Delaware recommendeda special 13-day snow goose season in October on and around Bombay HookNational Wildlife Refuge. The State of New Jersey recommended they be permittedto select brant and snow goose seasons separately within their respectiveduck zones. The State of New York asked that the Service select an optionto harvest Canada geese with a 90-day season with 1 bird daily throughOctober 15 and 3 birds daily thereafter or an 80-day season with 2 birdsdaily throughout as was recommended by the Flyway Council. The State ofFlorida expressed support of regulations designed to protect TennesseeValley Population (TVP) Canada geese in the flyway.<T3>Response</T3>. The Service concurs with the recommendation to increasethe season length to 50 days on Atlantic brant. In response to recent declinesof migrant Canada geese in the Atlantic Flyway, the Service concurs withCouncil recommendations to reduce overall harvest in the flyway. In northwesternPennsylvania, the Canada goose bag limits will be 2 rather than 3 birdsdaily pending an appraisal of the migration patterns and harvest distributionof Canada geese wintering in southern areas of the flyway. The Serviceconcurs with the 13-day special snow goose season in Delaware but notesthat the habitat problems on Bombay Hook National Wildlife Refuge cannotbe eliminated fully by a hunting program on snow geese and will requirefurther attention. In New York, New Jersey, and parts of Pennsylvania,the Service is providing frameworks for Canada geese it believes most likelyto protect southern migrants.Mississippi Flyway<T3>Public Hearing Comments</T3>_Mr. Richard Elden, representing the MichiganDepartment of Natural Resources, opposed a reduction in Canada goose baglimits in the southeastern portion of the State to provide added protectionto Tennessee Valley Population (TVP) Canada geese. Recent data suggestthat some of these geese migrate to wintering areas in southern portionsof the Atlantic Flyway, where populations are declining. Mr. Elden statedthat Michigan has previously taken measures to protect TVP geese by selectingshorter hunting seasons than the flyway frameworks permit and establishinga quota zone in one of the principal harvest areas to control harvest.Further, the State is establishing a new quota zone in another importantharvest area this year. He requested that the bag limits be the same aslast year.<T3>Written Comments</T3>_One individual supported the special early andlate seasons to harvest local giant Canada geese in Michigan. One individualrecommended that if longer goose seasons are provided for Illinois, thesame season length be made available for the entire State rather than partof the State.<T3>Response</T3>. The Service concurs with Mr. Eden's request and thefinal frameworks herein contain the same limits as in 1987. Prior to theestablishment of 1989 hunting regulations the Service will work with Statesin the Atlantic and Mississippi Flyways to clarify the migration patternsand harvest distribution of Canada geese wintering in the southern regionof the Atlantic Flyway. The Service notes the support of special Canadagoose seasons in Michigan. These experimental seasons are being continuedthis year. The final frameworks herein provide the same goose season lengthstatewide in Illinois.Pacific Flyway<T3>Written Comments</T3>_Numerous organizations and individuals endorsedcontinued harvest restrictions on various Pacific Flyway geese that havedeclined in recent decades. One agricultural organization and four individualsrecommended a February 15 extended framework for Canada goose seasons inOregon. The Wildlife Management Institute called for additional actionsbeyond those in 1987-88 to rebuild the dusky Canada goose population andreduce the harvest of Pacific brant.<T3>Response</T3>. Support for continued restrictions for depressed populationsof Pacific Flyway geese is acknowledged. Regarding an extended frameworkfor Canada geese in Oregon, the Service sees little justification at thistime, but if such proposal is beieved to be necessary and warranted, itshould be addressed by the Pacific Flyway Council in order to determineits relationship to the management plans for Canada geese in question andthe impact on all States that utilize these geese, including Alaska. TheService acknowledges recommendations that additional actions be taken tobuild dusky Canada geese and Pacific brant populations; however, we believethat actions identified in the respective management plans other than additionalhunting restrictions should be emphasized at this time. Additional huntingrestrictions would produce little or no positive effect on these populationsabove that occurring with the existing regulations which are already highlyrestrictive. 15. Tundra Swans<T3>Public Hearing Comments</T3>_Ms. Jennifer Lewis, representing the HumaneSociety of the United States, stated that there is no justification fortundra swan seasons in the Atlantic Flyway. She indicated that the overallgood population status and depredation on grain fields by tundra swansshould not be used as reasons for encouraging hunting seasons on this species.Mr. Doug Inkley, representing the National Wildlife Federation, expressedsupport for tundra swan seasons proposed in New Jersey and Virginia andthe existing season in North Carolina. <T3>Written Comments</T3>_One regional waterfowl organization offered supportfor a limited season on tundra swans in New Jersey to reduce crop losses.The State of Rhode Island and the National Wildlife Federation endorsedthe proposed season expansion on the eastern population of tundra swansin the Atlantic Flyway. Twenty individuals, in addition to the nearly 2,000noted in the August 12, 1988, <T4>Federal Register </T4>(53 FR 30627), voiced their opposition to tundraswan seasons. <T3>Response. </T3>The Service notes the concern regarding the huntingof tundra swans but finds no biological reason to prohibit swan hunting.Presently, tundra swans exceed objective levels and a management plan andharvest strategy have been developed to give adequate protection to thespecies. Therefore, the Service has approved experimental seasons witha limited number of permits in North Carolina, New Jersey, Virginia andAlaska, as well as operational seasons in Montana, North Dakota, SouthDakota, Utah and Nevada. <ITAG tagnum="84">Nontoxic Shot Regulations</ITAG>In the June 28, 1988, <T4>Federal Register </T4>(53 FR 24284), the Service published a finalrule describing zones in which use of lead shot would be prohibited forhunting waterfowl, coots and certain other species in the 1988-89 huntingseason. Waterfowl hunters are advised to become familiar with State andlocal regulations regarding the use of nontoxic shot for waterfowl hunting.<ITAG tagnum="84">NEPA Consideration</ITAG>NEPA considerations are covered by the programmatic document, ``Final SupplementalEnvironmental Impact Statement: Issuance of Annual Regulations Permittingthe Sport Hunting of Migratory Birds (FSES 88-14)'', filed with CEQ onJune 9, 1988. Notices of Availability were published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on June 16, 1988 (53 FR 22582), and June 17,1988 (53 FR 22727), and the Service's Record of Decision was publishedon August 18, 1988 (53 FR 31341). <ITAG tagnum="84">Endangered Species Act Consideration</ITAG>Section 7 of the Endangered Species Act provides that, ``The Secretaryshall review other programs administered by him and utilize such programsin furtherance of the purposes of this Act'' [and shall] ``insure thatany action authorized, funded or carried out * * * is not likely to jeopardizethe continued existence of any endangered or threatened species or resultin the destruction or modification of [critical] habitat * * *''Subsequently, the Service initiated section 7 consultation under the EndangeredSpecies Act for the proposed hunting season frameworks. On June 17, 1988, the Division of Endangered Species and Habitat Conservationgave a biological opinion that the proposed actions were not likely tojeopardize the continued existence of listed species or result in the destructionor adverse modification of their critical habitats. As in the past, hunting regulations this year are designed, among otherthings, to remove or alleviate chances of conflict between seasons formigratory game birds and the protection and conservation of endangeredand threatened species. The Service's biological opinion resulting from its consultation undersection 7 is considered a public document and is available for inspectionin the Office of Endangered Species and the Office of Migratory Bird Management,U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Department of the Interior, Washington,DC 20240.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act, Executive Order 12291 and the PaperworkReduction Act </ITAG>In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>dated March 9, 1988 (53 FR 7702), the Servicereported measures it had undertaken to comply with requirements of theRegulatory Flexibility Act and the Executive Order. These included preparinga Determination of Effects and an updated Final Regulatory Impact Analysis,and publication of a summary of the latter. These regulations have beendetermined to be major under Executive Order 12291 and they have a significanteconomic impact on substantial numbers of small entities under the RegulatoryFlexibility Act. This determination is detailed in the aforementioned documentswhich are available upon request from the Office of Migratory Bird Management,U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Department of the Interior, Washington,DC 20240. These regulations contain no information collections subjectto Office of Management and Budget under the Paperwork Reduction Act of1980. <ITAG tagnum="84">Memorandum of Law</ITAG>The Service published its Memorandum of Law, required by section 4 of ExecutiveOrder 12291, in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>dated August 9, 1988 (53 FR 29897). <ITAG tagnum="84">Authorship</ITAG>The primary author of this rule is Morton M. Smith, Office of MigratoryBird Management, working under the direction of Rollin D. Sparrowe, Chief.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulations Promulgation</ITAG>The rulemaking process for migratory bird hunting must, by its nature,operate under severe time constraints. However, the Service is of the viewthat every attempt should be made to give the public the greatest possibleopportunity to comment on the regulations. Thus, when the proposed latehunting season rulemakings were published on August 9, 1988, the Serviceestablished what it believed was the longest period possible for publiccomment. In doing this the Service recognized that at the close of thecomment period, time would be of the essence. That is, if there was a delayin the effective date of these regulations after this final rulemaking,the Service is of the opinion that the States would have insufficient timeto select season dates, shooting hours and limits; to communicate theseselections to the Service; and to establish and publicize the necessaryregulations and procedures that implement their decisions. Therefore, the Service under authority of the Migratory Bird Treaty Actof July 3, 1918, as amended (40 Stat. 755; 16 U.S.C. 703 <T3>et seq.</T3>), prescribes final frameworks setting for the speciesto be hunted, the daily bag and possession limits, the shooting hours,the season lengths, the earliest opening and closing season dates, andhunting areas, from which State conservation agency officials may selecthunting season dates and other options. Upon receipt of the season andoption selections from State officials, the Service will publish in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>a final rulemaking amending 50 CFR Part 20 (andSection;andSection;20.104 through 20.107 and andSection; 20.109) to reflect seasons, limitsand shooting hours for the conterminous United States for the 1988-89 season.The Service therefore finds ``good cause'' exists, within the terms of5 U.S.C. 553(d)(3) of the Administrative Procedure Act, and these frameworkswill, therefore, take effect immediately upon publication. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 50 CFR Part 20</ITAG>Exports, Hunting, Imports, Transportation, Wildlife.The rules that eventually will be promulgated for the 1988-89 hunting seasonare authorized under the Migratory Bird Treaty Act of July 3, 1918, (40Stat. 755; 16 U.S.C. 701-708h); the Fish and Wildlife Improvement Act of1978 (92 Stat. 3112; 16 U.S.C. 712); and the Alaska Game Act of 1925 (43Stat. 739; as amended, 54 Stat. 1103-04). <ITAG tagnum="85">Final Regulations Frameworks for 1988-89 Late Hunting Seasons on CertainMigratory Game Birds</ITAG>Pursuant to the Migratory Bird Treaty Act, the Secretary of the Interiorhas approved final frameworks for season lengths, shooting hours, bag andpossession limits and outside dates within which States may select seasonsfor hunting waterfowl and coots. Frameworks are summarized below. General<T3>Split Season: </T3>States in all Flyways may split their season forducks, geese or brant into two segments. States in the Atlantic and CentralFlyways may, in lieu of zoning, split their season for ducks or geese intothree segments. Exceptions are noted in appropriate sections. <T3>Shooting Hours: </T3>From sunrise to sunset daily, for all speciesand seasons, including falconry seasons. <T3>Deferred Season Selections: </T3>States that did not select rail, woodcock,snipe, sandhill cranes, common moorhens and purple gallinules and sea duckseasons in July should do so at the time they make their waterfowl selections.Frameworks for open seasons and season lengths, bag and possession limitoptions, and other special provisions are listed below by Flyway. Atlantic FlywayThe Atlantic Flyway includes Connecticut, Delaware, Florida, Georgia, Maine,Maryland, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, North Carolina,Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Carolina, Vermont, Virginia and WestVirginia. Ducks, Coots and Mergansers<T3>Hunting Seasons and Duck Limits:</T3><T3>Outside Dates: </T3>Between October 7, 1988, and January 8, 1989.<T3>Hunting Season: </T3>Not more than 30 days.<T3>Canvasbacks: </T3>The season on canvasbacks is closed.<T3>Duck Limits: </T3>The daily bag limit of ducks is 3 and may includeno more than 3 mallards (only 1 may be a hen), 2 wood ducks, 2 redheads,1 black duck, 1 mottled duck, 1 pintail, and 1 fulvous tree duck. The possessionlimit is twice the daily bag limit.<T3>Merganser Limits: </T3>Throughout the Flyway the daily bag limit ofmergansers is 5, only 1 of which may be a hooded merganser. The possessionlimit is 10, only 2 of which may be hooded mergansers.<T3>Coot Limits: </T3>Throughout the Flyway daily bag and possession limitsof coots are 15 and 30, respectively.<T3>Early Wood Duck Season Option: </T3>Virginia, North Carolina, SouthCarolina and Georgia may split their regular hunting season so that a huntingseason not to exceed 9 consecutive days occurs between October 7 and October15. During this period, no special restrictions within the regular dailybag and possession limits established for the Flyway shall apply to woodducks. For other ducks, daily bag and possession limits shall be the sameas established for the Flyway.<T3>Zoning:_New York: </T3>New York may, for the <T3>Long Island Zone, </T3>select season dates and daily bag and possessionlimits which differ from those in the remainder of the State.Upstate New York (excluding the Lake Champlain zone) may be divided intothree zones (West, North, South) for the purpose of setting separate duck,coot and merganser seasons. A 2-segment split season may be selected ineach zone.The <T3>West Zone </T3>is that portion of Upstate New York lying west of aline commencing at the north shore of the Salmon River and its junctionwith Lake Ontario and extending easterly along the north shore of the SalmonRiver to its intersection with Interstate Highway 81, then southerly alongInterstate Highway 81 to the Pennsylvania border.The <T3>North </T3>and <T3>South Zones </T3>are bordered on the west by the boundary describedabove and are separated from each other as follows: starting at the intersectionof Interstate Highway 81 and State Route 49 and extending easterly alongState Route 49 to its junction with State Route 365 at Rome, then easterlyalong State Route 365 to its junction with State Route 28 at Trenton, theneasterly along State Route 28 to its junction with State Route 29 at Middleville,then easterly along State Route 29 to its intersection with InterstateHighway 87 at Saratoga Springs, then northerly along Interstate Highway87 to its junction with State Route 9, then northerly along State Route9 to its junction with State Route 149, then easterly along State Route149 to its junction with State Route 4 at Fort Ann, then northerly alongState Route 4 to its intersection with the New York/Vermont boundary.<T3>Connecticut </T3>may be divided into two zones as follows:a. <T3>North Zone_</T3>That portion of the State north of Interstate 95.b. <T3>South Zone_</T3>That portion of the State south of Interstate 95.<T3>Maine </T3>may be divided into two zones as follows:a. <T3>North Zone_</T3>Game Management Zones 1 through 5.b. <T3>South Zone_</T3>Game Management Zones 6 through 8.<T3>New Hampshire_Coastal Zone_</T3>That portion of the State east of aboundary formed by State Highway 4 beginning at the Maine-New Hampshireline in Rollinsford west to the city of Dover, south to the intersectionof State Highway 108, south along State Highway 108 through Madbury, Durhamand Newmarket to the junction of State Highway 85 in Newfields, south toState Highway 101 in Exeter, east to State Highway 51 (Exeter-Hampton Expressway),east to Interstate 95 (New Hampshire Turnpike) in Hampton, and south alongInterstate 95 to the Massachusetts line.<T3>Inland Zone_</T3>That portion of the State north and west of the aboveboundary.<T3>West Virginia </T3>may be divided into two zones as follows:a. <T3>Allegheny Mountain Upland Zone_</T3>The eastern boundary extends southalong U.S. Route 220 through Keyser, West Virginia, to the intersectionof U.S. Route 50; follows U.S. Route 50 to the intersection with StateRoute 93; follows State Route 93 south to the intersection with State Route42 and continues south on State Route 42 to Petersburg; follows State Route28 south to Minnehaha Springs; then follows State Route 39 west to U.S.Route 219; and follows U.S. Route 219 south to the intersection of Interstate64. The southern boundary follows I-64 west to the intersection with U.S.Route 60, and follows Route 60 west to the intersection of U.S. Route 19.The western boundary follows: Route 19 north to the intersection of I-79,and follows I-79 north to the intersection of U.S. Route 48. The northernboundary follows U.S. Route 48 east to the Maryland State line and theState line to the point of beginning.b. Remainder of the State_That portion outside the above boundaries.<T3>Zoning Experiments: Vermont </T3>will continue a Lake Champlain Zonein 1988. The Lake Champlain Zone of New York must follow the waterfowlseason, daily bag and possession limits, and shooting hours selected byVermont. <T3>Massachusetts, New Jersey, </T3>and <T3>Pennsylvania </T3>may continue zoning experiments now in progress asshown in the sections that follow. <T3>Massachusetts </T3>and <T3>New Jersey </T3>may be divided into three zones, <T3>Pennsylvania </T3>into four zones and <T3>Vermont </T3>into two zones all on an experimental basis for the purposeof setting separate duck, coot and merganser seasons. A two-segment splitseason without penalty may be selected. The basic daily bag limit of ducksin each zone and the restrictions applicable to the regular season forthe Flyway also apply.<T3>Zone Definitions:_Massachusetts_Western Zone_</T3>That portion of theState west of a line extending from the Vermont line at Interstate 91,south to Route 9, west on Route 9 to Route 10, south on Route 10 to Route202, south on Route 202 to the Connecticut line.<T3>Central Zone_</T3>That portion of the State east of the Western Zoneand west of a line extending from the New Hampshire line at Interstate95 south to Route 1, south on Route 1 to I-93, south on I-93 to Route 3,south on Route 3 to Route 6, west on Route 6 to Route 28, west on Route28 to I-195, west to the Rhode Island line. <T3>EXCEPT </T3>the waters, and the lands 150 yards along the high-watermark, of the Assonit River to the Route 24 bridge, and the Taunton Riverto the Center St.-Elm St. bridge shall be in the Coastal Zone.<T3>Coastal Zone_</T3>That portion of the State east and south of the CentralZone.<T3>New Jersey_Coastal Zone_</T3>That portion of New Jersey seaward ofa continuous line beginning at the New York State boundary line in RaritanBay; then west along the New York boundary line to its intersection withRoute 440 at Perth Amboy; then west on Route 440 to its intersection withthe Garden State Parkway; then south on the Garden State Parkway to theshoreline at Cape May and continuing to the Delaware boundary in DelawareBay.<T3>North Zone_</T3>That portion of New Jersey west of the Coastal Zoneand north of a boundary formed by Route 70 beginning at the Garden StateParkway west to the New Jersey Turnpike, north on the turnpike to Route206, north on Route 206 to Route 1, Trenton, west on Route 1 to the PennsylvaniaState boundary in the Delaware River.<T3>South Zone_</T3>That portion of New Jersey not within the North Zoneor the Coastal Zone.<T3>Pennsylvania_Lake Erie Zone_</T3>The Lake Erie waters of Pennsylvaniaand a shoreline margin along Lake Erie from New York on the east to Ohioon the west extending 150 yards inland, but including all of Presque IslePeninsula.<T3>North Zone</T3>_That portion of the State north of I-80 from the NewJersey State line west to the junction of State Route 147; then north onState Route 147 to the junction of Route 220, then west and/or south onRoute 220 to the junction of I-80, then west on I-80 to its junctions withthe Allegheny River, and then north along but not including the AlleghenyRiver to the New York border.<T3>Northwest Zone_</T3>That portion of the State bounded on the northby the Lake Erie Zone and the New York line, on the east by and includingthe Allegheny River, on the south by Interstate Highway I-80, and on thewest by the Ohio line.<T3>South Zone</T3>_The remaining portion of the State. <T3>Vermont</T3>_<T3>Lake Champlain Zone</T3>_Includes the United States portion of LakeChamplain and those portions of New York and Vermont which includes thatpart of New York lying east and north of boundary running south from theCanadian border along New York Route 9B to New York Route 9 south of Champlain,New York; New York Route 9 to New York Route 22 south of Keeseville; alongNew York Route 22 to South Bay, along and around the shoreline of SouthBay to New York Route 22; along New York Route 22 to U.S. Highway 4 atWhitehall; and along U.S. Highway 4 to the Vermont border. From the NewYork border at U.S. Highway 4, along U.S. Highway 4 to Vermont Route 22Aat Fair Haven; Route 22A to U.S. Highway 7 at Vergennes; U.S. Highway 7to the Canadian border. <T3>Interior Vermont Zone</T3>_The remaining portion of the State. <T3>Sea Ducks: </T3>The daily bag and possession limit for sea ducks inspecial sea duck areas is in addition to the limits applying to other ducksduring the regular duck season. In all areas outside of special sea duckareas, sea ducks are included in the regular duck season daily bag andpossession limits.Canada Geese <T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths, and Limits: </T3>Between October 1,1988, and January 20, 1989, Maine, New Hampshire, Vermont, Massachusetts,Pennsylvania, and West Virginia may select 70-day seasons for Canada geesewith a daily bag and possession limit of 3 and 6 geese, respectively, exceptin Pennsylvania Counties of Erie, Mercer, Butler, and Crawford, where thedaily bag and possession limits are 2 and 4, respectively. In Maryland,Delaware and Virginia (except Back Bay) the Canada goose season may be70 days with an opening date of October 31, 1988, and a closing date ofJanuary 31, 1989, with 2 geese daily and 4 in possession. In New York (includingLong Island), New Jersey, and that portion of Pennsylvania lying east andsouth of a boundary beginning at Interstate Highway 83 at the Marylandborder and extending north to Harrisburg, then east on I-81 to Route 443,east on 443 to Leighton, then east via 208 to Stroudsburg, then east onI-80 to the New Jersey line, the Canada goose season length may be 90 dayswith the opening framework date of October 1, 1988, and the closing frameworkdate extended to January 31, 1989. In addition, that portion of the SusquehannaRiver from Harrisburg north to the confluence of the west and north branchesat Northumberland, including a 25-yard zone of land adjacent to the watersof the river, is included in the 90-day zone. The daily bag and possessionlimits within this area will be 1 and 2, respectively through October 15,1988, and 3 and 6, respectively thereafter. In Rhode Island, and Connecticut(North Zone) season length will be 90 days between October 1, 1988, andJanuary 31, 1989, with a daily bag and possession limit of 3 and 6, respectively.In the South Zone of Connecticut (that portion south of Interstate 95),the Canada goose season length may be 90 days with the closing frameworkdate extended to February 5, 1989. The daily bag limit and possession limitwill be 3 and 6, respectively, through January 14, and 5 and 10 respectivelyfrom January 15 to February 5, 1989. This season in the south Zone of Connecticut is experimental. The BackBay of Virginia, North Carolina (that portion south of Interstate Highway95), and South Carolina may select an 11-day season for Canada geese withina January 20-31, 1989, framework; the daily bag and possession limits are1 and 2 Canada geese, respectively. In the Coastal Zone of Massachusetts,a special resident Canada goose season may be held during January 21, 1989,to February 5, 1989; the daily bag and possession limits are 5 and 10,respectively. <T3>Closures on Canada geese: </T3>The season for Canada geese is closedin Florida and Georgia. Snow Geese <T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths, and Limits: </T3>Between October 1,1988, and January 31, 1989, States in the Atlantic Flyway may select a90-day season for snow geese (including blue geese); the daily bag andpossession limits are 4 and 8, respectively. Between October 17, 1988,and October 29, 1988, a special snow goose season may be held in Delawareon Bombay Hook National Wildlife Refuge and immediate area (as describedin State regulations) at the discretion of the Refuge Manager. Daily bagand possession limits are 4 and 8, respectively. This season is in additionto the 90-day regular season. Atlantic Brant <T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths, and Limits: </T3>Between October 1,1988, and January 20, 1989, States in the Atlantic Flyway may select a50-day season for Atlantic brant; the daily bag and possession limits are2 and 4 brant, respectively. Tundra Swans In New Jersey, Virginia and North Carolina an experimental season for tundraswans may be selected with 200, 600 and 6,000 permits, respectively, subjectto the following conditions: (a) the season may be 90 days and must runconcurrently with the snow goose season; (b) the State agency must issuepermits and obtain harvest and hunter participation data; and (c) eachpermittee is authorized to take 1 tundra swan per season. MISSISSIPPI FLYWAY The Mississippi Flyway includes Alabama, Arkansas, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa,Kentucky, Louisiana, Michigan, Minnesota, Mississippi, Missouri, Ohio,Tennessee and Wisconsin. Ducks, Coots, and Mergansers <T3>Outside Dates: </T3>Between October 8, 1988, and January 8, 1989, inall States. <T3>Hunting Season: </T3>Not more than 30 days. <T3>Canvasbacks: </T3>The season on canvasbacks is closed. <T3>Limits: </T3>The daily bag limit of ducks is 3, and may include nomore than 2 mallards (no more than 1 of which may be a female), 1 blackduck, 1 pintail, 2 wood ducks, and 1 redhead. The possession limit is twicethe daily bag limit. <T3>Merganser Limits: </T3>The daily bag limit of mergansers is 5, only1 of which may be a hooded merganser. The possession limit is twice thedaily bag limit. <T3>Coot Limits: </T3>The daily bag and possession limits are 15 and 30,respectively. <T3>Early Wood Duck Season Option: </T3>Arkansas, Louisiana, Mississippiand Alabama may split their regular duck hunting seasons in such a waythat a hunting season not to exceed 9 consecutive days may occur betweenOctober 8 and October 16. During this period, no special restrictions withinthe regular daily bag and possession limits established for the Flywayshall apply to wood ducks. For other species of ducks, daily bag and possessionlimits shall be the same as established for the Flyway. This exceptionto the daily bag and possession limits for wood ducks shall not apply tothat portion of the duck hunting season that occurs after October 16. <T3>Pymatuning Reservoir Area, Ohio: </T3>The waterflowl seasons, limitsand shooting hours in the Pymatuning Reservoir area of Ohio will be thesame as those selected by Pennsylvania. The area includes Pymatuning Reservoirand that part of Ohio bounded on the north by county Road 306 known asWoodward Road, on the west by Pymatuning Lake Road, and on the south byU.S. Highway 322. <T3>Zoning: Alabama, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Louisiana, Michigan, Missouri,Ohio, Tennessee, </T3>and <T3>Wisconsin </T3>may select hunting seasons for ducks, coots and mergansersby zones described as follows: <T3>Alabama: </T3>South Zone_Mobile and Baldwin Counties. North Zone_Theremainder of Alabama. The season in the South Zone may be split into twosegments.   <T3>Illinois:</T3> North Zone_That portion of the State north of a linerunning east from the Iowa border along Illinois Highway 92 to I-280, eastalong I-280 to I-80, then east along I-80 to the Indiana border. CentralZone_That portion of the State between the North and South Zone boundaries.South Zone_That portion of the State south of a line running east fromthe Missouri border along the Modoc Ferry route to Randolph County Highway12, north along Highway 12 to Illinois Highway 3, north along IllinoisHighway 3 to Illinois Highway 159, north along Illinois Highway 159 toIllinois Highway 161, east along Illinois Highway 161 to Illinois Highway4, north along Illinois Highway 4 to I-70, then east along I-70 to theIndiana border.<T3>Indiana:</T3> North Zone: That portion of the State north of a lineextending east from the Illinois border along State Highway 18 to U.S.Highway 31, then north along U.S. 31 to U.S. Highway 24, then east alongU.S. 24 to Huntington, then southeast along U.S. Highway 224 to the Ohioborder. Ohio River Zone: That portion of Indiana south of a line extendingeast from the Illinois border along Interstate Highway 64 to New Albany,then east along State Highway 62 to State Highway 56, then east along StateHighway 56 to Vevay, then on State Highway 156 along the Ohio River toNorth Landing, then north along State Highway 56 to U.S. Highway 50, thennortheast along U.S. 50 to the Ohio border. South Zone: That portion ofthe State between the North and Ohio River Zone boundaries. The seasonin each zone may be split into two segments.<T3>Iowa:</T3> North Zone_That portion of Iowa north of a line runningwest from the Illinois border along I-80 to U.S. 59, north along U.S. 59to State Highway 37, northwest along State Highway 37 to State Highway175, then west along State Highway 175 to the Nebraska border. South Zone_Theremainder of the State.<T3>Louisiana:</T3> West Zone_That portion of the State west of a boundarybeginning at the Arkansas-Louisiana border on Louisiana Highway 3, thensouth along Louisiana Highway 3 to Bossier City, east along Interstate20 to Minden, south along Louisiana Highway 7 to Ringgold, east along LouisianaHighway 4 to Jonesboro, south along U.S. Highway 167 to Lafayette, southeastalong U.S. Highway 90 to Houma, south along the Houma Navigation Channelto the Gulf of Mexico through Cat Island Pass. East Zone_The remainderof Louisiana. The season in each zone may be split into two segments.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> No additional days are offered for the West Zone since Louisianais considered part of the Mississippi Flyway as announced in June 7, 1988,<T4>Federal Register</T4> (53 FR 10876).</ITAG><T3>Michigan:</T3> North Zone_The Upper Peninsula. South Zone_That portionof the State south of a line beginning at the Wisconsin border in LakeMichigan due west of the mouth of Stony Creek in Oceana County; then dueeast to, and east and south along the south shore of, Stony Creek to WebsterRoad, east and south on Webster Road to Stony Lake Road, east on StonyLake and Garfield Roads to M-20, east on M-20 to U.S.-10B.R. in the cityof Midland, east on U.S.-10B.R. to U.S.-10, east on U.S.-10 and M-25 tothe Saginaw River, downstream along the thread of the Saginaw River toSaginaw Bay, then on a northeasterly line, passing one-half mile northof the Corps of Engineers confined disposal island offshore of the Carnpowerplant, to a point one mile north of the Charity islands, then continuingnortheasterly to the Ontario border in Lake Huron. Middle Zone_The remainderof the State. Michigan may split its season in each zone into two segments.<T3>Missouri:</T3> North Zone_That portion of Missouri north of a linerunning east from the Kansas border along U.S. Highway 54 to U.S. Highway65, south along U.S. 65 to State Highway 32, east along State Highway 32to State Highway 72, east along State Highway 72 to State Highway 21, southalong State Highway 21 to U.S. Highway 60, east along U.S. 60 to StateHighway 51, south along State Highway 51 to State Highway 53, south alongState Highway 53 to U.S. Highway 62 to I-55, north along I-55 to StateHighway 34, then east along State Highway 34 to the Illinois border. SouthZone_The remainder of Missouri. Missouri may split its season in each zoneinto two segments.<T3>Ohio:</T3> The counties of Darke, Miami, Clark, Champaign, Union, Delaware,Licking, Muskingam, Guernsey, Harrison and Jefferson and all counties norththereof. In addition, the North Zone also includes that portion of theBuckeye Lake area in Fairfield and Perry Counties bounded on the west byState Highway 37, on the south by State Highway 204, and on the east byState Highway 13. Ohio River Zone_The counties of Hamilton, Clermont, Brown,Adams, Scioto, Lawrence, Gallia and Meigs. South Zone_That portion of theState between the North and Ohio River Zone boundaries. Ohio may splitits season in each zone into two segments.<T3>Tennessee:</T3> Reelfoot Zone_Lake and Obion Counties, or a designatedportion of that area. State Zone_The remainder of Tennessee. Seasons maysplit into two segments in each zone.<T3>Wisconsin:</T3> North Zone_That portion of the State north of a lineextending northerly from the Minnesota border along the center line ofthe Chippewa River to State Highway 35, east along State Highway 35 toState Highway 25, north along State Highway 25 to U.S. Highway 10, eastalong U.S. Highway 10 to its junction with the Manitowoc Harbor in thecity of Manitowoc, then easterly to the eastern State boundary in LakeMichigan. South Zone_The remainder of Wisconsin. The season in the SouthZone may be split into two segments.Geese<T3>Definiton:</T3> For the purpose of hunting regulations listed below,the term ``geese'' also includes brant.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> The various zones and areas identified in this section aredescribed in the respective States' regulations.</ITAG><T3>Outside Dates, Season Lengths and Limits:</T3> Between October 1, 1988,and January 22, 1989 (January 31 in Kentucky, Arkansas, Tennessee, Mississippi,and Alabama), States may select 70-day seasons for geese, with a dailybag limit of 5 geese, to include no more than 2 white-fronted geese. Thepossession limit is 10 geese, to include no more than 4 white-fronted geese.Regulations for Canada geese and exceptions to the above general provisionsare shown below by State.<T3>Outside Dates and Limits on Snow and White-fronted Geese in Louisiana:</T3>Between October 1, 1988 and February 14, 1989, Louisiana may hold 70-dayseasons on snow (including blue) and white-fronted geese by zones establishedfor duck seasons. Daily bag and possession limits are as described above.<T3>Minnesota.</T3> In the:(a) West Central Goose Zone_the season for Canada geese may extend for30 days. In the Lac Qui Parle Goose Zone the season will close after 30days or when 4,000 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Throughoutthe 5-county area the daily bag limit is 1 Canada goose and the possessionlimit is 2.(b) Southeast Goose Zone_the season for Canada geese may extend for 70consecutive days. The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possessionlimit is 4. In selected areas of the Metro Goose Management Block and inOlmsted County, experimental 10-day late seasons may be held during Decemberto harvest Giant Canada geese. During the seasons, the daily bag limitis 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4.(c) Remainder of the State_the season for Canada geese may extend for 40days. The daily bag limit is 1 Canada goose and the possession limit is2.<T3>Iowa:</T3> The season may extend for 45 consecutive days. The dailybag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. The season forgeese in the Southwest Goose Zone may be held at a different time thanthe season in the remainder of the State.<T3>Missouri.</T3> In the:(a) Swan Lake Zone_the season for Canada geese closes after 40 days orwhen 10,000 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. The dailybag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4.(b) Southeast Zone_A 50-day season on Canada geese may be selected, witha daily bag limit of 2 Canada geese and a possession limit of 4. (c) Remainder of the State_the season for Canada geese may extend for 40days in the respective duck hunting zones. The daily bag limit is 1 Canadagoose, and the possession limit is 2.<T3>Wisconsin: </T3>The total harvest of Canada geese in the State willbe limited to 68,200 birds. In the:(a) Horicon Zone_The framework opening date for Canada geese is September24, and the harvest of Canada geese is limited to 46,100 birds. The seasonmay not exceed 70 days. All Canada geese harvested must be tagged and thetotal number of tags issued will be limited so that the quota of 46,100birds is not exceeded. (b) Theresa Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 3,000 birds.The season may not exceed 50 days. The bag limit is 1 Canada goose perpermittee per 5-day period, with a season limit of 4.(c) Pine Island Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 1,000 birds.The season may not exceed 40 days. All Canada geese harvested must be tagged.The daily bag limit is 1 Canada goose per permittee and the season limitis 4. The total number of tags issued will not exceed 1,980.(d) Collins Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 2,000 birds.The season may not exceed 40 days. All Canada geese harvested must be tagged.The daily bag limit is 1 Canada goose and the season limit is 4. The totalnumber of tags issued will not exceed 3,900.(e) Exterior Zone_The harvest of Canada geese is limited to 16,100 birds.The season may not exceed 35 days, except as noted below. Limits are 1Canada goose daily and 2 in possession, except as noted below. In the MississippiRiver Zone, the season for Canada geese may extend for 70 days. Limitsare 1 Canada goose daily and 2 in possession through November 19, and 2daily and 4 in possession thereafter. In the Brown County Zone, a speciallate season to control local populations of giant Canada geese may be heldduring December 1-31. The daily bag and possession limits during this specialseason are 2 and 4 birds, respectively. In the Rock Prairie Zone, a speciallate season to harvest giant Canada geese may be held between November5 and December 11. During the late season, the daily bag limit is 1 Canadagoose and the possession limit is 2. In Wisconsin, the progress of the Canada goose harvest must be monitoredby zone, and the respective zone's season closed, if necessary, to insurethat the harvest does not exceed the quota stated above. <T3>Illinois: </T3>The total harvest of Canada geese in the State willbe limited to 74,000 birds. In the:(a) Southern Illinois Quota Zone_The season for Canada geese will closeafter 50 days or when 37,000 birds have been harvested, whichever occursfirst. The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is4. (b) Rend Lake Quota Zone_The season for Canada geese will close after 50days or when 11,100 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first.The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. (c) Tri-County Zone_The season for Canada geese may not exceed 50 days.The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. (d) Remainder of State_Seasons for Canada geese up to 50 days may be selectedby zones established for duck hunting seasons. The daily bag limit is 2Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. <T3>Michigan: </T3>The total harvest of Canada geese in the State willbe limited to 79,400 birds. In the:(a) North Zone_The framework opening date for geese is September 26 andthe season for Canada geese may extend for 40 days, except in the SuperiorCounties Goose Management Area (GMA), where the season will close after40 days or when 8,000 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first.The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. (b) Middle Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for 40 days. Thedaily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. (c) South Zone:(1) Allegan County GMA_the season for Canada geese will close after 50days or when 4,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Thedaily bag limit is 1 Canada goose and the possession limit is 2. (2) Muskegon Wastewater GMA_the season for Canada geese will close after50 days or when 500 birds have been harvested whichever occurs first. Thedaily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. (3) Saginaw County GMA_the season for Canada geese will close after 50days or when 4,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. Thedaily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. (4) Fish Point GMA_the season for Canada geese will close after 50 daysor when 2,500 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. The dailybag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. (5) Remainder of South Zone_the season for Canada geese may extend for40 days. The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limitis 4. (d) Southern Michigan GMA_A late Canada goose season of up to 30 days maybe held between January 7 and February 5, 1989. The daily bag limit is2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. <T3>Ohio: </T3>The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possessionlimit is 4. <T3>Indiana</T3>: The total harvest of Canada geese in the State will belimited to 28,400 birds. In:(a) Posey County_The season for Canada geese will close after 50 days orwhen 8,300 birds have been harvested, whichever occurs first. The dailybag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4. The season mayextend to January 31, 1989.(b) Remainder of the State_The season for Canada geese may extend for 70days. The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is4.<T3>Kentucky</T3>: In the:(a) Western Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for 50 days, andthe harvest will be limited to 22,500 birds. Of the 22,500-bird quota,14,200 birds will be allocated to the Ballard Reporting Area and 4,500birds will be allocated to the Henderson/Union Reporting Area. If the quotain either reporting area is reached prior to completion of the 50-day season,the season in that reporting area will be closed. If this occurs, the seasonin those counties and portions of counties outside of, but associated with,the respective subzone (listed in State regulations) may continue for anadditional 7 days, not to exceed a total of 50 days. The daily bag limitis 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4.(b) Remainder of the State_The season may extend for 70 days. The dailybag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4.<T3>Tennessee</T3>: In the:(a) Northwest Tennessee Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for50 days, and the harvest will be limited to 8,900 birds. Of the 8,900-birdquota, 6,200 birds will be allocated to the Reelfoot Subzone. If the quotain the Reelfoot Quota Zone is reached prior to completion of the 50-dayseason, the season in the quota zone will be closed. If this occurs, theseason in the remainder of the Northwest Tennessee Zone may continue foran additional 7 days, not to exceed a total of 50 days. The daily bag limitis 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is 4.(b) Southwest Tennessee Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for15 days. The daily bag limit is 1 Canada goose and the possession limitis 2.(c) Remainder of the State_The season for Canada geese may extend for 70days. The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possession limit is4.<T3>Arkansas</T3>: The total harvest of Canada geese in the State willbe limited to 2,400 birds. The season for Canada geese may extend for 16days. The daily bag is 1 Canada goose and the possession limit is 2.<T3>Louisiana</T3>: The season for Canada geese is closed.<T3>Mississippi</T3>: In the:(a) Sardis Zone_The season for Canada geese may extend for 30 days, 10days of which must occur before December 15, 1988. The daily bag limitis 1 Canada goose and possession limit is 2.(b) Remainder of the State_The season for Canada geese may not exceed 15days. The daily bag limit is 1 Canada goose and the possession limit is2.<T3>Alabama</T3>: The daily bag limit is 2 Canada geese and the possessionlimit is 4.<T3>Missouri, Illinois, Indiana, Kentucky and Tennessee Quota Zone Closures</T3>:When it has been determined that the quota of Canada geese allotted tothe Southern Illinois Quota Zone, the Rend Lake Quota Zone in Illinois,the Swan Lake Zone in Missouri, Posey County in Indiana, the Ballard andHenderson-Union Subzones in Kentucky and the Reelfoot Subzone in Tennesseewill have been filled, the season for taking Canada geese in the respectivearea will be closed by the Director upon giving public notice through localinformation media at least 48 hours in advance of the time and date ofclosing, or by the State through State regulations with such notice andtime (not less than 48 hours) as they deem necessary.<T3>Shipping Restriction</T3>: In Illinous and Missouri and in the Kentuckycounties of Ballard, Hickman, Fulton and Carlisle, geese may not be transported,shipped or delivered for transportation or shipment by common carrier,the Postal Service, or by any person except as the personal baggage oflicensed waterfowl hunters, provided that no hunter shall possess or transportmore than the legally-prescribed possession limit of geese. Geese possessedor transported by persons other than the taker must be labeled with thename and address of the taker and the date taken.CENTRAL FLYWAYThe Central Flyway includes Colorado (east of the Continental Divide),Kansas, Montana (Blaine, Carbon, Fergus, Judith Basin, Stillwater, Sweetgrass,Wheatland and all counties east thereof), Nebraska, New Mexico (east ofthe Continental Divide except that the entire Jicarilla Apache Indian Reservationis in the Pacific Flyway), North Dakota, Oklahoma, South Dakota, Texasand Wyoming (east of the Continental Divide).Ducks (including mergansers) and Coots<T3>Outside Dates</T3>: October 8, 1988, through January 8, 1989.<T3>Canvasbacks</T3>: The season on canvasbacks is closed.<T3>Hunting Season</T3>: Seasons in the Low Plains Unit may include nomore than 39 days. Seasons in the High Plains Mallard Management Unit mayinclude no more than 51 days, provided that the last 12 days may startno earlier than December 10, 1988. The High Plains Unit, roughly definedas that portion of the Central Flyway which lies west of the 100th meridian,shall be described in State regulations.States may split their seasons into 2 or, in lieu of zoning, 3 segments.<T3>Daily Bag and Possession Limits</T3>: The daily bag limit is 3 ducks,including no more than 2 mallards, no more than 1 of which may be a female,1 mottled duck, 1 pintail, 1 redhead, 1 hooded merganser, and 2 wood ducks.The possession limit is twice the daily bag limit.Daily bag and possession limits for coots are 15 and 30, respectively.<T3>Zoning: </T3>Duck and coot hunting seasons may be selected independentlyin existing zones as described in the following States:<T3>Montana </T3>(Central Flyway portion):Experimental Zone 1. The counties of Bighorn, Blaine, Carbon, Daniels,Fergus, Garfield, Golden Valley, Judith Basin, McCone, Musselshell, Petroleum,Phillips, Richland, Roosevelt, Sheridan, Stillwater, Sweetgrass, Valley,Wheatland and Yellowstone.Experimental Zone 2. The counties of Carter, Custer, Dawson, Fallon, PowderRiver, Prairie, Rosebud, Treasure and Wibaux.<T3>Nebraska </T3>(Low Plains portion):<T3>Zone 1. </T3>Keya Paha County east of U.S. Highway 183 and all of BoydCounty including the adjacent waters of the Niobrara River.<T3>Zone 2. </T3>The area bounded by designated highways and politicalboundaries starting on U.S. 73 at the State Line near Falls City; northto N-67; north through Nemaha to U.S. 73-75; north to U.S. 34; west tothe Alvo Road; north to U.S. 6; northeast to N-63; north and west to U.S.77; north to N-92; west to U.S. 81; south to N-66; west to N-14; southto I-80; west to U.S. 34; west to N-10; south to the State Line; west toU.S. 283; north to N-23; west to N-47; north to U.S. 30; east to N-14;north to N-52; northwesterly to N-91; west to U.S. 281; north to WheelerCounty and including all of Wheeler and Garfield Counties and Loup Countyeast of U.S. 183; east on N-70 from Wheeler County to N-14; south to N-39;southeast to N-22; east to U.S. 81; southeast to U.S. 30; east to U.S.73; north to N-51; east to the State Line; and south and west along theState Line to the point of beginning.<T3>Zone 3. </T3>The area, excluding Zone 1, north of Zone 2.<T3>Zone 4. </T3>The area south of Zone 2.New Mexico:<T3>Experimental Zone 1. </T3>The Central Flyway portion of New Mexiconorth of Interstate Highway 40 and U.S. Highway 54.<T3>Experimental Zone 2. </T3>The remainder of the Central Flyway portionof New Mexico.Oklahoma:<T3>Zone 1. </T3>That portion of northwestern Oklahoma, except the Panhandle,bounded by the following highways: starting at the Texas-Oklahoma border,OK 33 to OK 47, OK 47 to U.S. 183, U.S. 183 to I-40, I-40 to U.S. 177,U.S. 177 to OK 33, OK 33 to I-35, I-35 to U.S. 60, U.S. 60 to U.S. 64,U.S. 64 to OK 132, and OK 132 to the Oklahoma-Kansas state line.<T3>Zone 2. </T3>The remainder of the Low Plains.<T3>South Dakota </T3>(Low Plains portion):<T3>South Zone. </T3>Bon Homme, Yankton and Clay Counties south of S.D.Highway 50; Charles Mix County south and west of a line formed by S.D.Highway 50 from Douglas County to Geddes, Highways CFAS 6198 and FAS 6516to Lake Andes, and S.D. Highway 50 to Bon Homme County; Gregory County;and Union County south and west of S.D. Highway 50 and Interstate Highway29.<T3>North Zone. </T3>The remainder of the Low Plains.<T3>Wyoming </T3>(Central Flyway portion): In lieu of its previous fourzones, Wyoming may split their season in the Central Flyway portion ofthe State into three segments of equal or unequal length.Geese<T3>Definitions: </T3>In the Central Flyway, ``geese'' includes all speciesof geese and brant, ``dark geese'' includes Canada and white-fronted geeseand black brant, and ``light geese'' includes all others.<T3>Outside Dates: </T3>October 1, 1988, through January 22, 1989, fordark geese and October 1, 1988, through February 14, 1989 (February 28,1989, in New Mexico), for light geese.<T3>Possession Limits: </T3>Goose possession limits are twice the dailybag limits (see exception for light geese in the Rio Grande Valley Unitof New Mexico).<T3>Hunting Seasons: </T3>Seasons in States, and independently in describedgoose management units within States, may be as follows:<T3>Colorado: </T3>No more than 95 days with a daily limit of 5 geese thatmay include no more than 2 dark geese.<T3>Kansas: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 72 days with daily limitsof 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November27 and no more than 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose during theremainder of the season.For Light Goose Unit 1 (that area east of U.S. 75 and north of I-70), nomore than 86 days with a daily limit of 5.For Light Goose Unit 2 (the remainder of Kansas), no more than 86 dayswith a daily limit of 5.<T3>Montana: </T3>No more than 95 days with daily limits of 2 dark geeseand 3 light geese in Sheridan County and 3 dark geese and 3 light geesein the remainder of the Central Flyway portion of the State.<T3>Nebraska: </T3>For Dark Goose Unit 1 (Boyd, Cedar west of U.S. 81,Keya Paha east of U.S. 183, and Knox Counties), no more than 79 days withdaily limits of 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November11 and no more than 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-frontedgoose for the remainder of the season.For Dark Goose Unit 2 (the remainder of the State east of the followinghighways starting at the South Dakota line; U.S. 183 to NE 2, NE 2 to U.S.281, and U.S. 281 to Kansas), no more than 72 days with daily limits of2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November20 and no more than 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose for the remainderof the season.For Dark Goose Unit 3 (that part of the State west of Units 1 and 2), nomore than 72 days with daily limits of 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada gooseand 1 white-fronted goose through November 20 and no more than 1 Canadagoose and 1 white-fronted goose for the remainder of the season.For light geese, no more than 86 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>New Mexico: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 95 days with a dailylimit of 2.For light geese in the Rio Grande Valley Unit (the Central Flyway portionof New Mexico west of highways starting at the Texas line north of El Paso:U.S. 54 to U.S. 60, U.S. 60 to U.S. 285, and U.S. 285 to the Colorado line),no more than 107 days with a daily limit of 5 and a possession limit of20.For light geese in the remainder of the Central Flyway portion of New Mexico,no more than 95 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>North Dakota: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 72 days with dailylimits of 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose or 2 white-fronted geesethrough October 30 and no more than 2 dark geese during the remainder ofthe season.For light geese, no more than 86 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>Oklahoma: </T3>For dark geese, no more than 72 days with a daily limitof 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose.For light geese, no more than 86 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>South Dakota: </T3>For dark geese in the Missouri River Unit (the Countiesof Bon Homme, Brule, Buffalo, Campbell, Charles Mix, Corson east of SDHighway 65, Dewey, Gregory, Haakon north of Kirley Road and east of PlumCreek, Hughes, Hyde, Lyman north of Interstate 90 and east of U.S. Highway183, Potter, Stanley, Sully, Tripp east of U.S. Highway 183, Walworth,and Yankton west of U.S. Highway 81), no more than 79 days with daily limitsof 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose through November 11 and nomore than 2 Canada geese or 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose forthe remainder of the season.For dark geese in the remainder of the State, no more than 72 days witha daily limit of 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose.For light geese, no more than 86 days with a daily limit of 5.<T3>Texas: </T3>West of U.S. 81, no more than 95 days with a daily limitof 5 geese which may include no more than 2 dark geese.For dark geese east of U.S. 81, no more than 72 days with a daily limitof 1 Canada goose and 1 white-fronted goose.For light geese east of U.S. 81, no more than 86 days with a daily limitof 5.<T3>Wyoming: </T3>No more than 95 days with a daily limit of 2.Tundra SwansThe following States may issue permits authorizing each permittee to takeno more than one tundra swan, subject to guidelines in a current, approvedmanagement plan and general conditions that each State determine hunterparticipation and harvest, and specified conditions as follows:<T3>Montana: </T3>(Central Flyway portion): no more than 500 permits withthe season dates concurrent with the season for taking geese.<T3>North Dakota: </T3>No more than 1,000 permits with the season datesconcurrent with the season for taking light geese.<T3>South Dakota: </T3>No more than 500 permits with the season dates concurrentwith the season for taking light geese.PACIFIC FLYWAYThe Pacific Flyway includes Arizona, California, Colorado (west of theContinental Divide), Idaho, Montana (including and to the west of Hill,Chouteau, Cascade, Meagher and Park Counties), Nevada, New Mexico (theJicarilla Apache Indian Reservation and west of the Continental Divide),Oregon, Utah, Washington and Wyoming (west of the Continental Divide includingthe Great Divide Basin).Ducks, Coots, Common Moorhens, and Common Snipe<T3>Outside Dates: </T3>Between October 8, 1988, and January 8, 1989.<T3>Hunting Seasons: </T3>Seasons may be split into two segments. Concurrent59-day seasons on ducks (including mergansers), coots, common moorhens(gallinules) and common snipe may be selected except as subsequently noted.In the Oregon counties or Morrow and Umatilla and in Washington all areaslying east of the summit of the Cascade Mountains and east of the Big WhiteSalmon River in Klickitat County, the seasons may be an additional 7 days.<T3>Canvasback: </T3>The season on canvasbacks is closed.<T3>Duck Limits: </T3>The basic daily bag limit is 4 ducks, including nomore than 3 mallards, no more than 1 of which may be a female, 1 pintail,and 2 redheads. The possession limit is twice the daily bag limit.<T3>Coot and Common Moorhen (Gallinule) Limits: </T3>The daily bag andpossession limit of coots and common moorhens is 25 singly or in the aggregate.<T3>Common Snipe Limits: </T3>The daily bag and possession limit of commonsnipe is 8 and 16, respectively.<T3>California_Waterfowl Zones: </T3>Season dates for the Colorado RiverZone of California must coincide with season dates selected by Arizona.Season dates for the Northeastern and Southern Zones of California maydiffer from those in the remainder of the States.<T3>Idaho_Waterfowl Zones: </T3>Duck and goose season dates for Zone 1and Zone 2 may differ. Zone 1 includes all lands and waters within theFort Hall Indian Reservation and Bannock County; Bingham County exceptthat portion within the Blackfoot Reservoir drainage; and Power Countyeast of State Highway 37 and State Highway 39. Zone 2 includes the remainderof the State.<T3>Nevada_Clark County Waterfowl Zone: </T3>Season dates for Clark Countymay differ from those in the remainder of Nevada.<T3>Colorado, Montana, New Mexico and Wyoming_Common Snipe:</T3> For Statespartially within the Flyway a 93-day season for common snipe may be selectedto occur between September 1, 1988, and February 28, 1989, and need notbe concurrent with the duck season.Geese (including Brant)<T3>Outside dates, season lengths and limits on geese (including brant):</T3>Seasons may be split into two segments. Between October 1, 1988, andJanuary 22, 1989, a 93-day season on geese (except brant in Washington,Oregon and California) may be selected, except as subsequently noted. Thebasic daily bag and possession limit is 6, provided that the daily baglimit includes no more than 3 white geese (snow, including blue, and Ross'geese) and 3 dark geese (all other species of geese). In Washington andIdaho, the daily bag and possession limits are 3 and 6 geese, respectively.Washington, Oregon and California may select an open season for brant withdaily bag and possession limits of 2 and 4 brant, respectively. Brant seasonsmay not exceed 16-consecutive days in Washington and Oregon and 30-consecutivedays in California.<T3>Aleutian Canada goose closure: </T3>There will be no open season onAleutian Canada geese. Emergency closures may be invoked for all Canadageese should Aleutian Canada goose distribution patterns or other circumstancesjustify such actions.<T3>California, Oregon, Washington_Cackling Canada goose closure: </T3>Therewill be no open season on cackling Canada geese in California, Oregon andWashington.<T3>California_Canada goose and dark goose closures: </T3>Three areas inCalifornia, described as follows: are restricted in the hunting of certaingeese:(1) In the counties of Del Norte and Humboldt there will be no open seasonfor Canada geese.(2) In the Sacramento Valley in that area bounded by a line beginning atWillows in Glenn County proceeding south on Interstate Highway 5 to thejunction with Hahn Road north of Arbuckle in Colusa County; then easterlyon Hahn Road and the Grimes-Arbuckle Road to Grimes on the Sacramento River;then southerly on the Sacramento River to the Tisdale By-pass; then easterlyon the Tisdale By-pass to where it meets O'Banion Road; then easterly onO'Banion Road to State Highway 99; then northerly on State Highway 99 toits junction with the Gridley-Colusa Highway in Gridley in Butte County;then westerly on the Gridley-Colusa Highway to its junction with the RiverRoad; then northerly on the River Road to the Princeton Ferry; then westerlyacross the Sacramento River to State Highway 45; then northerly on StateHighway 45 to its junction with State Highway 162; then continuing northerlyon State Highway 45-162 to Glenn; then westerly on State Highway 162 tothe point of beginning in Willows, there will be no open season for Canadageese. In this area, the season on dark geese must end on or before November30, 1988.(3) In the San Joaquin Valley in that area bounded by a lien beginningat Modesto in Stanislaus County proceeding west on State Highway 132 tothe junction of Interstate Highway 5; then southerly on Interstate Highway5 to the junction of State Highway 152 in Merced County; then easterlyon State Highway 152 to the junction of State Highway 59; then northerlyon State Highway 59 to the junction of State Highway 99 at Merced; thennortherly and westerly on State Highway 99 to the point of beginning; thehunting season for Canada geese will close no later than November 23, 1988.<T3>California (Northeastern Zone)_geese: </T3>In the Northeastern Zoneof California the season may be from October 8, 1988, to January 8, 1989,except that white-fronted geese may be taken only during October 8 to November1, 1988. Limits will be 3 geese per day and 6 in possession, of which notmore than 1 white-fronted goose or 2 Canada geese shall be in the dailylimit and not more than 2 white-fronted geese and 4 Canada geese shallbe in possession.<T3>California (Balance of the State Zone)_geese: </T3>In the Balance ofthe State Zone the season may be from October 30, 1988, through January22, 1989, except that white-fronted geese may be taken only during October30, 1988, to January 1, 1989. Limits shall be 3 geese per day and in possession,of which not more than 1 may be a dark goose. The dark goose limits maybe expanded to 2 provided that they are Canada geese (except Aleutian andcackling Canada geese for which the season is closed).<T3>Western Oregon: </T3>In those portions of Coos and Curry Counties lyingwest of U.S. Highway 101 and that portion of Western Oregon west and northof a line starting at Oregon-Washington State line on the Columbia River;south on Interstate Highway 5 to its junction with State Highway 22 atSalem; east on State Highway 22 to the Stayton cutoff; south on the Staytoncutoff through Stayton and straight south to the Santiam River; west (downstream)on the Santiam River to Interstate Highway 5; south on Interstate Highway5 to State Highway 126 at Eugene; west on State Highway 126 and endingat the Oregon coast, except for designated areas, there shall be no openseason on Canada geese. In the remainder of Western Oregon, the seasonand limits shall be the same as those for the Pacific Flyway, except theseasons in the designated area must end upon attainment of their individualquotas which collectively equal 210 dusky Canada geese. Hunting of Canadageese in those designated areas shall only be by hunters possessing a state-issuedpermit authorizing them to do so.<T3>Oregon (Lake and Klamath Counties)_geese: </T3>In the Oregon countiesof Lake and Klamath the season on white-fronted geese will not open beforeNovember 1.<T3>Washington and Oregon (Columbia Basin Portions)_geese: </T3>In theWashington counties of Adams, Benton, Douglas, Franklin, Grant, Kittitas,Klickitat, Lincoln, Walla Walla and Yakima, and in the Oregon countiesof Gilliam, Morrow, Sherman, Umatilla, Union, Wallowa and Wasco, the gooseseason may be an additional 7 days.<T3>Western Washington: </T3>In Clark, Cowlitz, Wahkiakum, and PacificCounties, except for areas to be designated by the State, there shall beno open season on Canada geese. For designated areas the seasons must endupon attainment of individual quotas which collectively will equal 90 duskyCanada geese. Hunting of Canada geese in those designated areas shall onlybe by hunters possessing a state-issued permit authorizing them to do so.<T3>Idaho, Oregon and Montana_Pacific Population of Canada geese: </T3>Inthat portion of Idaho lying west of the line formed by U.S. Highway 93north from the Nevada border to Shoshone, thence northerly on Idaho StateHighway 75 (formerly U.S. Highway 93) to Challis, thence northerly on U.S.Highway 93 to the Montana border (except Boundary, Bonner, Kootenai, Benewah,Shoshone, Latah, Nez Perce, Lewis, Clearwater and Idaho Counties); in theOregon counties of Baker and Malheur; and in Montana (Pacific Flyway portionwest of the Continental Divide), the daily bag and possession limits are2 and 4 Canada geese, respectively; and the season for Canada geese maynot extend beyond January 8, 1989.<T3>Montana and Wyoming_Rocky Mountain Population of Canada Geese: </T3>InMontana (Pacific Flyway portion east of the Continental Divide) and Wyomingthe season may not extend beyond January 8, 1989. In Lincoln, Sweetwaterand Sublette Counties, Wyoming, the combined special sandhill crane-Canadagoose seasons and the regular goose season shall not exceed 93 days.<T3>Idaho, Colorado and Utah: </T3>In that portion of Idaho lying eastof the line formed by U.S. Highway 93 north from the Nevada border to Shoshone,thence northerly on Idaho State Highway 75 (formerly U.S. Highway 93) toChallis, thence northerly on U.S. Highway 93 to the Montana border; inColorado; and in Utah, except Washington County, the daily bag and possessionlimits are 2 and 4 Canada geese, respectively, and the season for Canadageese may be no more than 86 days and may not extend beyond January 8,1989.<T3>Nevada: </T3>Nevada may designate season dates on geese in Clark Countyand in Elko County and that portion of White Pine County within Ruby LakeNational Wildlife Refuge differing from those in the remainder of the State.In Clark County the season on Canada geese may be no more than 86 days.Except for Clark County the daily bag and possession limits are 2 and 4Canada geese, respectively. In Clark County the daily bag and possessionlimits are 2 Canada geese.<T3>Arizona, California, Utah and New Mexico: </T3>In California, the ColoradoRiver Zone where the season must be the same as that selected by Arizonaand the Southern Zone; in Arizona; in New Mexico; and in Washington County,Utah; the season for Canada geese may be no more than 86 days. The dailybag and possession limit is 2 Canada geese except in that portion of CaliforniaDepartment of Fish and Game District 22 within the Southern Zone (i.e.,Imperial Valley) where the daily bag and possession limits for Canada geeseare 1 and 2, respectively.Tundra SwansIn Utah, Nevada and Montana, an open season for tundra swans may be selectedunder the following conditions: (a) between October 1, 1988, and January22, 1989, a 93-day season may be selected, and seasons may be split intotwo segments; (b) appropriate State agency must issue permits and obtainharvest and hunter participation data; (c) in Utah, no more than 2,500permits may be issued, authorizing each permittee to take 1 tundra swan;(d) in Nevada, no more than 650 permits may be issued, authorizing eachpermittee to take 1 tundra swan in either Churchill, Lyon, or PershingCounties; (e) in Montana, no more than 500 permits may be issued authorizingeach permittee to take 1 tundra swan in either Teton, Cascade, Hill, Liberty,Toole or Pondera Counties.SPECIAL FALCONRY FRAMEWORKS<T3>Extended Seasons: </T3>Falconry is a permitted means of taking migratorygame birds in any State meeting Federal falconry standards in 50 CFR 21.29(k).These States may select an extended season not exceeding 107 days for takingmigratory game birds in accordance with the following:<T3>Framework Dates: </T3>Seasons must fall between September 1, 1988 andMarch 10, 1989.<T3>Daily Bag and Possession Limits: </T3>Falconry daily bag and possessionlimits for all permitted migratory game birds shall not exceed 3 and 6birds, respectively, singly or in the aggregate, during both regular huntingseasons and extended falconry seasons.<T3>Regulations Publication: </T3>Each State selecting the special seasonmust inform the Service of the season dates and publish said regulations.<T3>Regular Seasons: </T3>General hunting regulations, including seasons,hours, and limits, apply to falconry in each State listed in 50 CFR 21.29(k)which does not select an extended falconry season.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>In no instance shall the total number of days in any combinationof duck seasons (regular duck season, sea duck season, September seasons,or falconry season) exceed 107 days for a species in one geographical area.The extension of this falconry framework to include the period September1, 1988-March 10, 1989, is considered tentative, and will be reviewed incooperation with States offering such extensions after a period of severalyears.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Date: September 8, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Susan Recce,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary for Fish and Wildlife and Parks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-21249 Filed 9-15-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-55-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>